Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,105
Filing of certificate of authority.

Unless the Secretary of State determines that an application for a certificate of authority does not comply with the filing requirements of the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act, the Secretary of State, upon payment of all filing fees, shall file the application, prepare, sign, and file a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, and send a copy of the filed certificate, together with a receipt for the fees, to the foreign limited cooperative association or its representative.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 105.